Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 5-205, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-205. A. No person after January 1, 1980, may hunt
any deer or elk with legal firearms unless such person is wearing a
head covering and an outer garment above the waistline, both
totaling five hundred (500) square inches or more of clothing, both
consisting of daylight fluorescent orange color totaling not less
than four hundred (400) square inches, and both to be worn
conspicuously on the person.
B. The clothing requirements set forth in subsection A of this
section shall not apply in commercial hunting areas.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2111 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished by a fine of not less than Twenty-five
Dollars ($25.00) nor more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
February 16, 2026 - DO PASS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB2111 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)